Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-521
Protest petition; when dismissed.

Upon the day set for the hearing upon the original petition, if it shall appear to the Chief Water Officer from such evidence as may be adduced by any party in interest, that the protesting petition is not signed by the requisite number of owners of lands, the Chief Water Officer shall thereupon dismiss the protesting petition and shall proceed with the original hearing as provided in section 46-525.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 7(3), p. 529;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 157.